District of Columbia statutes.
6-102.05

Loans by District authorized.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to lend to the Authority such amounts as may be necessary to enable the Authority to comply with the provisions of the United States Housing Act of 1937 [42 U.S.C. § 1437 et seq.] and appropriations for such purpose are hereby authorized out of the revenues of the District of Columbia, and the Authority is empowered to accept such loans.

June 12, 1934, ch. 465, title II, § 205
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1189, ch. 691, § 5
1981 Ed., § 5-115.
1973 Ed., § 5-116.
The United States Housing Act of 1937, referred to in this section, is the Act of September 1, 1937, ch. 896.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.